Maryland, session 2025, SB0513.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
3–112.
(a) In this section, “unlawfully restrictive covenant” means any recorded covenant
or restriction that restricts ownership based on race, religious belief, or national origin.
(c) (1) A person may execute and record a restrictive covenant modification to
an unlawfully restrictive covenant in accordance with this section if the person:
(i) Holds an ownership interest in property that the person believes
is subject to the unlawfully restrictive covenant; or
(ii) Is a nonprofit entity that is required to enforce within a defined
residential neighborhood:
1. Covenants that limit architectural alterations,
renovations, landscaping elements, or other modifications to residential lots in the
neighborhood; and
2. The unlawfully restrictive covenant.
(2) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, a county or
municipality may execute and record a restrictive covenant modification to an unlawfully
restrictive covenant in accordance with this section if:
1. The property that the county or municipality believes is
subject to an unlawfully restrictive covenant is within the boundaries of the county or
municipality; and
2. At least 30 days before executing and recording the
restrictive covenant modification, the county or municipality provides written notice in
accordance with subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph of the county’s or municipality’s intent
to execute and record the restrictive covenant modification to all persons with an ownership
interest in the property.
(ii) A person with an ownership interest in the property may decline
to have the restrictive covenant modification executed and recorded by the county or
municipality by notifying the county or municipality within 30 days after the date of notice.

SENATE BILL 513 3
(iii) Notice under subparagraph (i)2 of this paragraph shall:
1. A. Be sent by first–class mail; [and]
B. BE PUBLISHED ONCE PER WEEK FOR 4 SUCCESSIVE
WEEKS IN ONE OR MORE NEWSPAPERS OF GENERAL CIRCULATION IN THE COUNTY
OR MUNICIPALITY WHERE THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED;
C. BE POSTED ON THE DOOR OF THE COURTHOUSE OR
ON A BULLETIN BOARD IN THE IMMEDIATE VICINITY OF THE DOOR OF THE
COURTHOUSE OF THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY WHERE THE PROPERTY IS
LOCATED; OR AND
D. B. BE POSTED ON THE OFFICIAL WEBSITE OF THE
COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY WHERE THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED; AND
2. Provide information on how a person with an ownership
interest in the property may decline to have the restrictive covenant modification executed
and recorded by the county or municipality.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.